California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) The department shall administer the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund and the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund. The department may administer the funds directly, through interagency agreements with other state agencies, through contracts with public or private entities, or through any combination thereof. If the department determines that a public or private entity is capable of making child care and development or preschool facilities loans or loan guarantees, the department may delegate the authority to review and approve those loans or guarantees to the public or private entity. The
 department is authorized to enter into interagency agreements to carry out the purposes of this section and Section 10305 by utilizing the services of small business financial development corporations established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 5 of Division 3 of the Corporations Code. Toward this end, the department is authorized to transfer funds from the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund to the California Economic Development Grant and Loan Fund established by Section 15327 of the Government Code and to transfer funds from the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund to the Small Business Expansion Fund established by Section 14030 of the Corporations Code. Those funds shall be deposited into a Child Care Direct Loan Fund Account and a Child Care Loan Guaranty Fund Account hereby established in the respective funds. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15310) of Part 6.7 of Division 3 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 5 of Division 3 of the Corporations Code, the funds in these accounts shall be administered in compliance with the requirements of this section and Section 10305.

(c) Eligible applicants for the loan guaranty program and the direct loan program shall include, but not be limited to, sole proprietorships, partnerships, proprietary and nonprofit corporations, and local public agencies that are responsible for contracting with or providing licensed child care and development services, preschool services, or both. Eligible facilities shall include licensed full-day and part-day child care and development facilities, preschool facilities, and licensed large family child care homes as described in Section 1597.465 of the Health and Safety Code, and licensed small family child care homes as described in Section 1597.44 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Loan guarantees and direct loans for family child care homes shall not be made for the purpose of purchasing a home or any real property.

(e) The State Department of Social Services shall provide input regarding program priorities that shall be considered in the funding of applications by the department. These priorities shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Geographic priorities based on the extent of need for child care and development and preschool supply-building efforts in different parts of the state.

(A) Not less than 30 percent of the loan guarantee and direct loan obligations shall benefit providers located in rural areas, as defined in subparagraph (B). If the amount of qualified applications from rural providers is
 insufficient to satisfy this requirement, the excess capacity reserved for rural providers may be made available to other qualified applications according to the policies and procedures of the department. The remaining 70 percent of funds shall be available to rural or urban areas and other priorities in accordance with this subdivision.

(B) For purposes of subdivision (a), rural communities are defined by any county with fewer than 400 residents per square mile.

(2) Age priorities based on the extent of need for child care and development or preschool supply-building efforts for children of different age groups.

(3) Income priorities shall include families transitioning to work or other lower income families. For purposes of this section, “lower income” shall have the same meaning as “income eligible” as set forth
 in Section 10271.5.

(4) Program priorities based on the extent of facilities needs among specific kinds of providers, including those that contract to administer state and federally funded child care and development or preschool programs administered by the State Department of Social Services or the State Department of Education, providers who have lost classrooms due to class size reduction or other state or local initiatives, or providers that need to expand to meet the needs of a child care or preschool initiative for recipients of aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3, or any successor program.

(f) The program priorities shall reflect input from representatives of diverse sectors of the child care and development or preschool fields, financial institutions, local planning councils, the Child Development Programs Advisory Committee, and the State
 Department of Social Services for purposes of identifying communities with high percentages of recipients of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3, or any successor program, who need child care or preschool to meet work requirements. As part of its annual report to the Legislature, required pursuant to Section 50408 of the Health and Safety Code, the department shall assess and report, after consultation with the State Department of Social Services, on the performance, effectiveness, and fiscal standing of the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund and the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund. The report shall include information on the number of defaults, the types of facilities in default, and a review of the adequacy of the set-aside for rural areas specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(g) The department shall adopt regulations and establish priorities, forms, policies and
 procedures for implementing and managing the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund and the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund and making the loan guarantees and direct loans authorized hereunder consistent with priorities provided by the State Department of Social Services. To the extent feasible, the department shall use applicant fees and points to cover its administrative costs. The department may utilize an amount of money from the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund and the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund, as appropriate, for reasonable administrative costs in any given fiscal year. Unless an appropriation for administrative costs is made in the annual Budget Act that exceeds the following limits, administrative expenditures shall not exceed 3 percent of the amount appropriated to each fund in the Budget Act of 1997.

(h) (1) The
 department shall adopt regulations to efficiently and effectively implement the microenterprise loan program described in this subdivision, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Making loans available from the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund to local microenterprise loan funds and other lenders who may relend the funds in appropriate amounts to eligible small family child care home providers described in Section 1597.44 of the Health and Safety Code, large family child care home providers described in Section 1597.465 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed child care and development facilities, and preschool facilities that serve up to 35 children.

(B) Authorizing a specified amount of guarantees of small loans by local microenterprise loan funds and other lenders serving eligible small family child care home providers described in Section
 1597.44 of the Health and Safety Code, large family child care home providers described in Section 1597.465 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed child care and development facilities, and preschool facilities that serve up to 35 children.

(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or Section 10305, a loan made pursuant to this subdivision shall not be made for less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or for more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and shall not be subject to the 75-percent investment restriction contained in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 10305.

(i) The department may adopt regulations for the purposes of this section as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For the purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including
 Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, any regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall not remain in effect more than 180 days unless the department complies with all provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as required by subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10306.

The Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund, the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund, and the Child Care Loan Guaranty Fund Account in the Small Business Expansion Fund are abolished. All moneys remaining in the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund, the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund, and the Child Care Loan Guaranty Fund Account in the Small Business Expansion Fund shall revert to the General Fund. The Department of Housing and Community Development shall deposit all subsequent loan repayments to the Treasurer to the credit of the General Fund. The abolishment of the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund, the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund, and the Child Care Loan Guaranty Fund Account in the Small
 Business Expansion Fund does not terminate any of the following rights, obligations, or authorities, or any provision necessary to carry out those rights, obligations, or authorities:

(a) The repayment of loans due and payable to the department or the relevant financial company.

(b) The obligation of the state to pay claims arising from the default of outstanding loans that have been guaranteed.

(c) Payment to lenders for default of any outstanding guaranteed loans secured by those moneys.

(d) The resolution of any cost recovery action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10307.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Board” means the State Allocation Board.

(2) “Lessee” means a child care and development or preschool contracting agency to whom the board has leased a relocatable facility pursuant to this section.

(b) The board, with the advice of the department, may do all of the following:

(1) Establish any qualifications that it deems will best serve the purposes of this section for determining the eligibility of child care and development or preschool contracting agencies to lease relocatable facilities under this
 section.

(2) Establish any procedures and policies in connection with the administration of this section that it deems necessary.

(3) Adopt any rules and regulations for the administration of this section requiring such procedure, forms, and information that it may deem necessary.

(4) Have constructed, furnished, equipped, or otherwise require whatever work is necessary to place relocatable child care and development and preschool facilities where needed.

(5) Own, have maintained, and lease relocatable classrooms to qualifying child care and development and preschool contracting agencies.

(c) The board shall lease relocatable facilities to qualifying child care and development and
 preschool contracting agencies and shall charge rent of one dollar ($1) per year. The board shall require lessees to undertake all necessary maintenance, repairs, renewal, and replacement to ensure that a project is at all times kept in good repair, working order, and condition. All costs incurred for this purpose shall be borne by the lessee.

(d) The board shall require lessees to insure at their own expense for the benefit of the state, any leased relocatable facility which is the property of the state, against any risks, including liability from the use thereof, in the amounts the board may deem necessary to protect the interest of the state.

(e) The board shall have authority to adopt rules establishing priorities for the acquisition and leasing of facilities to contracting agencies which will most benefit children needing child care and development or preschool programs. The
 board shall require each lessee to demonstrate that relocatable facilities are utilized solely for operation of child care and development or preschool programs.

(f) No relocatable facilities shall be made available to a contracting agency unless the agency furnishes evidence, satisfactory to the board, that the contracting agency has no other facility available for rental, lease, or purchase in the geographic service area that is economically or otherwise feasible.

(g) The board shall have prepared for its use, performance specifications for relocatable facilities and bids for their construction that can be solicited from more than one responsible bidder. The board shall from time to time solicit bids from, and award to, the lowest responsible competitive bidder, contracts for the construction or purchase of relocatable facilities that have been approved for lease to eligible
 child care and development or preschool contracting agencies.

(h) If at any time the board determines that a lessee’s need for particular relocatable facilities which were made available to the lessee pursuant to this chapter has ceased, the board may take possession of the relocatable facilities and may lease them to other eligible contracting agencies or, if there is no longer a need for the relocatable facilities, the board may dispose of them to public or private parties in the manner it deems to be in the best interests of the state.

(i) Any revenue which is derived from a lease or other disposition of the relocatable facilities pursuant to this section is continuously appropriated to the board for the purposes of this section to fund the purchase of other relocatable facilities for child care and development or preschool programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10307.5.

(a) In the event that a school district elects to discontinue its contract for child development or preschool services, the facilities owned by the school district and constructed through the provisions of the local tax override for child development or preschool purposes shall be made available to the local contractor whose bid is accepted for continuation of the services.

(b) The rent for such facilities shall not exceed the prevailing rental rate for such facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10308.

(a) (1) The Child Care Facilities Revolving Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury to provide funding for loans for the renovation, repair, or improvement of an existing building to make the building suitable for licensure for child care and development or preschool services, and for the purchase of new relocatable child care or preschool facilities for lease to local educational agencies and contracting agencies that provide child care and development or preschool services, pursuant to this chapter. The department may transfer state funds appropriated for child care and preschool facilities into this fund for allocation to local educational agencies and contracting agencies, as specified, for the purchase, transportation, and installation of facilities for replacement
 and expansion of capacity. Local educational agencies and contracting agencies using facilities purchased by the use of these funds shall be charged a leasing fee, either at a fair market value for those facilities or at an amount sufficient to amortize the cost of purchase and relocation, whichever amount is lower, over a 10-year period. Upon full repayment of the purchase and relocation costs, title shall transfer from the State of California to the local educational agency or contracting agency. Loans for renovation or repair shall be repaid within a period that does not exceed 10 years. The department shall deposit all revenue derived from the lease payments or renovation or repair loan repayments into the Child Care Facilities Revolving Fund.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund, including moneys deposited from lease payments or loan repayments, are continuously appropriated, without regard to
 fiscal years, to the department for expenditure pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Augmentations to the Child Care Facilities Revolving Fund made in the Budget Act of 2014 shall be used for loans for renovation or repair of existing local educational agency facilities to ensure those facilities meet applicable health and safety standards or the purchase of new relocatable child care and preschool facilities for lease to local educational agencies, for the purpose of expanding access to California state preschool program services pursuant to this chapter.

(b) On or before August 1 of each fiscal year, the department shall submit to the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office a report detailing the number of funding requests received and their purpose, the types of agencies that received funding from the Child Care Facilities Revolving Fund, the increased capacity that
 these facilities generated, a description of the manner in which the facilities are being used, and a projection of the lease payments and loan repayments collected and the funds available for future use.

(c) A local educational agency that provides child care pursuant to the California School Age Families Education Program (Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 54740) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code) is eligible to apply for and receive funding pursuant to this section.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of former Section 8280 of the Education Code, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10308.5.

Each county shall, as a minimum, maintain the level of expenditure for child development services provided by the county during the 1970–71 fiscal year. These funds shall be used exclusively for child development and preschool programs and shall be considered unrestricted funds unless restricted by the county granting the funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10308.7.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that child care and preschool programs have made valuable contributions towards ensuring that public assistance recipients will be able to accept and maintain employment or employment-related training. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that the department ensure that counties comply with the requirements of Section 10308.5.

(b) The department shall ensure each county’s compliance with Section 10308.5 by not issuing funds to a local child care contractor within a county until the department has received written certification from that county that the level of expenditure for child care services provided by the county has been maintained at the 1970–71 fiscal year level pursuant to Section
 10308.5. Funding provided by a county to a local child care or preschool contractor shall not adversely affect the reimbursement received by the agency from the department pursuant to Sections 10280, 10281.5, and 10282.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.

The department shall publish the methodology and data used, including county-specific data if such data is used, for the allocation of all child care funds. The department shall make available to the public within 90 days of an allocation, the accounting information for the allocation. It is the intent of the Legislature to expedite the allocation of funds to the field as quickly as possible. Nothing in this section shall create a requirement for a public hearing on the allocation methodology prior to the issuance of a request for proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.1.

(a) The department shall disburse augmentations to the base allocation for the expansion of child care and development programs to promote equal access to child development services across the state.

(b) The department shall use the formula developed pursuant to subdivision (c) and the priorities identified by local child care and development planning councils, unless those priorities do not meet the requirements of state or federal law, as a guide in disbursing augmentations pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall develop a formula for prioritizing the disbursement of augmentations pursuant to this section. The formula shall give priority to allocating funds
 to underserved areas. The formula shall use the definition of “underserved area” in Section 10213.5 and direct impact indicators of need for child care and development services in the county or subcounty areas. For purposes of this section, “subcounty areas” include, but are not limited to, school districts, census tracts, or ZIP Code areas that are deemed by the department to be most appropriate to the type of program receiving an augmentation. Direct impact indicators of need may include, but are not limited to, the teenage pregnancy rate, the unemployment rate, area household income, or the number or percentage of families receiving public assistance, eligible for Medi-Cal, or eligible for free or reduced-price school meals, and any unique characteristics of the population served by the type of program receiving an augmentation.

(d) To promote equal access to services, the department shall include in guidelines developed for use by local
 planning councils pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10486 guidance on identifying underserved areas and populations within counties. This guidance shall include reference to the direct impact indicators of need described in subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.3.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) There is a serious shortage of quality child day care and preschool facilities throughout the state.

(b) It is in the interest of the state’s children and families, and the state’s economic growth, to encourage the expansion of existing child day care and preschool facilities by assisting communities and interested government and private entities to finance child day care and preschool facilities.

(c) In addition to regional resource centers described in Provision 7(d) of Item 6110-196-0001 of the Budget Act of 1999, which focus on developing child care capacity in underserved
 areas of the state, there is a need to access capital for facilities on a systematic basis, especially to use limited public sector funds to leverage a greater private sector role in financing child day care and preschool facilities. The Legislature finds and declares that a financial intermediary could fill this role and support the regional resource centers and other local entities that work with potential providers by functioning as a centralized repository of training, best practices, and expertise on facilities financing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.5.

(a) The department shall contract with a nonprofit organization to serve as a financial intermediary. The nonprofit organization shall have staff who have expertise in financing and capital expansion, are knowledgeable about the child care and preschool field, and have the ability to develop and implement a plan to increase the availability of financing to renovate, expand, and construct child day care and preschool facilities, both in day care centers and family child care homes.

(b) The financial intermediary selected by the department shall undertake activities designed to increase funds available from the private and public sectors for the financing of child day care and preschool facilities. These activities shall include, but are
 not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Soliciting capital grants and program-related investments from foundations and corporations.

(2) Building partnerships with foundations and corporations.

(3) Developing lending commitments, linked deposits, and other financing programs with conventional financial institutions.

(4) Coordinating private sources of capital with existing public sector sources of financing for child day care and preschool facilities, including, but not limited to, the Department of Housing and Community Development and the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank.

(5) Coordinating financing efforts with the technical assistance provided by the regional
 resource centers described in Provision 7(d) of Item 6110-196-0001 of the Budget Act of 1999, and other local entities that work with potential providers.

(c) This section shall only be implemented to the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.7.

(a) The Legislature recognizes the importance of providing quality child care and preschool services. It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to assist counties in improving the retention of qualified child care and preschool employees who work directly with children who receive state-subsidized child care and preschool services.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature, in amending this section during the 2009–10 Regular Session, to address the unique challenges of the County of Los Angeles, in which an estimated 60,000 low-income children receive subsidized child care in nonstate-funded child care settings and an additional 50,000 eligible children are waiting for subsidized services.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the funds appropriated for the purposes of this section by paragraph (11) of Schedule (b) of Item 6110-196-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2000 (Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2000), and that are described in subdivision (i) of Provision 7 of that item, and any other funds appropriated for purposes of this section, shall be allocated to local child care and development planning councils based on the percentage of state-subsidized, center-based child care and preschool funds received in that county, and shall be used to address the retention of qualified child care and preschool employees in state-subsidized child care centers and preschools.

(2) Of the funds identified in paragraph (1), funds qualified pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, may also be used to address the retention of qualified
 persons working in licensed child care and preschool programs that serve a majority of children who receive subsidized child care and preschool services pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, family child care homes as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code. To qualify for use pursuant to this paragraph, the funds shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) The funds are allocated for use in the County of Los Angeles.

(B) The funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(C) The funds are unexpended after addressing the retention of qualified child care and preschool employees in state-subsidized child care centers and family child care home education networks.

(d) The department shall develop guidelines for
 use by local child care and development planning councils in developing county plans for the expenditure of funds allocated pursuant to this section. These guidelines shall be consistent with the department’s assessment of the current needs of the subsidized child care and preschool workforce, and shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Finance. Any county plan developed pursuant to these guidelines shall be approved by the department prior to the allocation of funds to the local child care and development planning council.

(e) Funds provided to a county for the purposes of this section shall be used in accordance with the plan approved pursuant to subdivision (d). A county with an approved plan may retain up to 1 percent of the county’s total allocation made pursuant to this section for reimbursement of administrative expenses associated with the planning process.

(f) The department shall provide an annual report, no later than April 10 of each year, to the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Governor that includes, but is not limited to, a summary of the distribution of the funds by county and a description of the use of the funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.8.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (f), the department is authorized to transfer funding, including funds that are not allocated to contracts or otherwise fully expended, across and within alternative payment programs described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) of this part, including, but not limited to, the Migrant Alternative Payment Program.

(2) Subject to subdivision (f), the department is authorized to transfer funding, including funds that are not allocated to contracts or otherwise fully expended, across and within the following programs:

(A) Migrant childcare and development programs described in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235)
 of this part.

(B) General childcare and development programs described in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240) of this part.

(C) Family childcare home education networks described in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250) of this part.

(D) Childcare and development programs for children with severe disabilities as described in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260) of this part.

(b) The department shall establish criteria for transfers of funding under this section that prioritize the following:

(1) Maintaining funding for subsidized childcare services in the same county or region in which the initial award was issued.

(2) Maintaining funding within the same program type for which the funds were initially issued.

(3) Providing funds to contractors in good standing.

(4) Providing funds to areas outside of the county or region where the initial award was issued if the department determines circumstances warrant the directed funds.

(5) Supporting populations in areas that the department determines would benefit from increased funding opportunities.

(6) Supporting contractors that the department determines have the ability to immediately provide childcare services in response to exigent circumstances.

(c) The department shall review subsidized childcare awards and contracts on an individual
 basis to determine a contractor’s readiness to serve children pursuant to the initial award. If the department determines that the contractor has not made sufficient progress toward serving children with awarded or allocated funds, the department may partially or fully redirect those funds across and within programs as specified in subdivision (a), subject to subdivision (b).

(d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may administer and implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of childcare bulletins or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted.

(e) By no later than October 1 of each year, the department shall update the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate Budget and Fiscal
 Review Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on transfers made pursuant to this section. The update shall include all of the following information:

(1) The amount of funds transferred pursuant to this section during the prior year, disaggregated by program, and the number of slots associated with these funds.

(2) The amount of funds transferred pursuant to this section to another childcare and development program.

(3) The amount of funds transferred pursuant to this section that remained within the same childcare and development program.

(f) (1) This section shall only be implemented to the extent not prohibited by federal law, regulation, and directives.

(2) This section shall only be implemented if, and to the extent to which, the department determines that children served by the programs specified in subdivision (a) may be provided with better service through the redirection of funds across and within those programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 33.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Child Care and Development Infrastructure and Workforce Development [10310.1. - 10311.]

10310.1.

(a) The department shall administer the Child Care and Development Infrastructure Grant Program to expand access to child care and development and preschool opportunities for children up to five years of age by providing resources to build new facilities or retrofit, renovate, repair, or expand existing facilities as provided in this section.

(b) (1) The department shall award infrastructure grants on a competitive basis to either of the following:

(A) Child care and development and preschool providers that are not local educational agencies and that are one or more of the following:

(i) A child care center or family child care home serving children through an alternative payment program pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225).

(ii) A migrant child care and development program serving children pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235).

(iii) A child care center or family child care home education network serving children through a California state preschool program pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(iv) A child care center or family child care home serving children through a general childcare and development program pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240).

(v) A family child care home
 education network serving children pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250).

(vi) Child care and development services for children with special needs pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260).

(vii) A child care center or family child care home serving children through a CalWORKs Stage 1, Stage 2, or Stage 3 program pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370).

(viii) A child care center or family child care home serving children through the Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children pursuant to Section 11461.6.

(B) Child care and development and preschool providers that are not local educational agencies and that meet two or more of the following:

(i) Have a demonstrated need for expanded access to subsidized child care and development and preschool programs as measured by the ratio of children in state and federally subsidized child care and development and preschool programs to eligible children in the applicant’s service area.

(ii) Are located in low-income communities, as measured by the proportion of children that qualify for state or federal subsidies for child care and development and preschool programs.

(iii) Plan to use grant funding to serve children that qualify for state or federal subsidies for child care and development and preschool programs.

(iv) Serve children from birth to five years of age, inclusive, with exceptional needs in inclusive environments.

(v) Wish to
 recover lost capacity as a result of a state or federally declared disaster.

(2) The department shall award infrastructure grants for any of the following purposes:

(A) Construction of new child care and development and preschool facilities to increase capacity or recover lost capacity as a result of a state or federally declared disaster.

(B) Renovation, repair, modernization, or retrofitting of existing child care and development and preschool facilities to increase capacity or recover lost capacity as a result of a state or federally declared disaster, or make existing child care and development and preschool facilities more resilient for future natural disasters.

(C) Renovation, repair, modernization, or retrofitting of existing facilities for use
 as child care and development and preschool facilities.

(D) Renovation, repair, modernization, or retrofitting of existing child care and development and preschool facilities to address needs related to the COVID-19 pandemic and other health and safety or licensure needs.

(c) The department shall award grants to applicants based upon criteria established by the department. The department shall release guidance to the public outlining the criteria for grant awards and the application process.

(d) The department shall give priority for grant funding to both of the following:

(1) Applicants with a demonstrated need for expanded access to subsidized child care and development and preschool programs, as measured by the ratio of children in subsidized child
 care and development and preschool programs to eligible children in the applicant’s service area.

(2) Applicants who are currently serving subsidized children in programs described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and who are not eligible for federal funding for these purposes.

(e) Infrastructure grants may be used for any of the following:

(1) One-time infrastructure costs, including, but not limited to, universal design facility renovations, retrofitting to meet licensing requirements, the cost of design, engineering, testing, inspections, plan checking, construction management, site acquisition and development, evaluation and response action costs relating to removal of hazardous substances at a new or existing site, demolition, construction, landscaping, or other related costs as determined
 by the department.
